Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1637.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Parental


Medical Rights Protection Act”.


B. The Legislature finds that parents have a fundamental right


to direct the medical care of their children and that the State of


Oklahoma’s interest in child welfare must be balanced against this

Req. No. 2319 Page 1


right. This Act limits the authority of the Department of Human


Services to remove a child solely on allegations of medical neglect.


This Act shall be liberally construed to protect the fundamental


right of parents to make medical decisions for their children,


consistent with the Constitutions of the United States and the State


of Oklahoma.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-3-105 of Title 10A, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this act, “medical necessity” means a condition


in which the absence of a specific treatment is reasonably certain


to result in death or permanent, irreversible physical impairment,


and where a safe and efficacious treatment exists that is reasonably


expected to prevent such outcome without causing a disproportionate


risk of serious harm.


B. No child shall be removed from the custody of a parent based


solely on allegations of neglect, as defined in Section 1-1-105 of


Title 10A of the Oklahoma Statutes, for the failure or omission to


provide medical care unless it is shown by clear and convincing


evidence that:


1. The proposed medical treatment is medically necessary to


prevent imminent death or permanent disability; and


2. The parent or guardian has refused or failed to obtain such


treatment after being fully informed, in writing or by sworn

Req. No. 2319 Page 2


testimony, of such medical necessity by a licensed health care


provider.


C. A parent or guardian may rebut a showing of medical


necessity by demonstrating that:


1. The child is receiving, or will receive, treatment under the


care of a licensed, registered, or credentialed medical or


alternative treatment professional authorized to treat the condition


within the scope of his or her recognized practice; and


2. The professional holds credentials recognized by any state


or federal authority and maintains active malpractice or


professional liability insurance.


D. The court shall allow parents to obtain discovery and


present expert testimony to rebut evidence of medical necessity.


The court shall not take judicial notice of contested scientific or


medical matters unless all parties agree or such evidence is


established through admissible expert testimony.


E. In cases alleging medical neglect, no emergency removal


order pursuant to Section 1-4-201 of Title 10A of the Oklahoma


Statutes shall issue unless the court also finds clear and


convincing evidence of other acts or threats of physical abuse


posing an imminent risk to the child’s safety.


F. Nothing in this act shall be construed to prevent the


Department of Human Services or law enforcement from acting in cases


of immediate and substantial risk of death or physical injury,

Req. No. 2319 Page 3


provided that such action is narrowly tailored to address the


specific emergency and is subject to judicial review by a district


court within twenty-four (24) hours.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2319 TEK 1/13/2026 6:38:22 PM





































Req. No. 2319 Page 4